Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

General Provisions

48-68-101. Application to existing domestic corporations.

Chapters 51-68 of this title apply to all domestic nonprofit corporations in existence on January 1, 1988, that were incorporated under any general statute of this state providing for incorporation of nonprofit corporations. Chapters 51-68 of this title shall, however, not apply to corporations, the charters of which were granted by special legislative act prior to the adoption of the Constitution of 1870. Such corporations may amend their charters for any purposes consistent with chapters 51-68 of this title and in the manner set out in chapters 51-68 of this title. Such amendments and the particular rights, obligations, duties, and privileges conferred or imposed by the amendments shall be subject to § 48-51-102.

Section 48-52-102(a) does not apply to the charter of any corporation existing on January 1, 1988, unless and until a charter amendment is filed. The first charter amendment filed by a corporation following January 1, 1988, shall include any information required by § 48-52-102(a) not otherwise on file in the office of the secretary of state, except that the name and address of each incorporator may be excluded, and the information required by § 48-52-102(a)(4) shall be provided for the current registered agent and registered office. Until such a charter amendment is filed, a corporation's registered agent shall be that agent specified in the office of the secretary of state on January 1, 1988, and such corporation's registered office shall be deemed to be that office specified as the address of its registered agent unless such agent or office is changed thereafter pursuant to chapter 55 or 65 of this title.

Chapters 51-68 of this title shall not apply to municipal corporations; provided, that this chapter shall apply to any public governmental corporation or authority created by or established under the authority of a municipal corporation or county or both for the performance of public functions, including industrial development boards created pursuant to title 7.

Chapter 523, § 1 (3.06 - 3.11) of the Acts of 1968, as amended, in effect on January 1, 1988, shall apply to any claims, applications, or proceedings for indemnification, or any corporate action authorizing indemnification, made or begun before January 1, 1988.

Chapter 523, § 1 (12.01 - 12.12, 12.14) of the Acts of 1968 and chapter 66, §§ 1 and 2 of the Acts of 1969, in effect on January 1, 1988, shall apply to any dissolution as to which a statement of intent to dissolve has been filed or a court proceeding filed before January 1, 1988.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 18.01.

Cross-References. Business corporations, transition provisions, title 48, ch. 27.

Law Reviews.

Conversions of Nonprofit Hospitals to For-Profit Status: The Tennessee Experience, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1077 (1998).

48-68-102. Application to qualified foreign corporations.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state on January 1, 1988, is subject to chapters 51-68 of this title but is not required to obtain a new certificate of authority to transact business under chapters 51-68 of this title.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 18.02.

48-68-103. Saving provisions.

Except as provided in subsection (b), the repeal of a statute by chapters 51-68 of this title does not affect:

The operation of the statute or any action taken under it before its repeal and if any certificate or document is required to be filed in any public office of this state relating to such action, it may be filed after January 1, 1988, in accordance with the prior statute; provided, that such certificate or document is received by the secretary of state or other recording official on or before April 30, 1988. Any certificate or document recorded or filed pursuant to this subdivision (a)(1) shall pay the fee required by chapters 51-68 of this title for such recording or filing;

Any ratification, right, remedy, privilege, obligation, or liability acquired, accrued, or incurred under the statute before its repeal;

Any violation of the statute, or any penalty, forfeiture, or punishment incurred because of the violation, before its repeal; or

Any proceeding commenced, or reorganization or dissolution authorized by the board of directors, under the statute before its repeal, and the proceeding, reorganization, or dissolution may be completed in accordance with the statute as if it had not been repealed.

If a penalty or punishment imposed for violation of a statute repealed by chapters 51-68 of this title is reduced by chapters 51-68 of this title, the penalty or punishment if not already imposed shall be imposed in accordance with chapters 51-68 of this title.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 18.03.

48-68-104. Public benefit and mutual benefit corporations.

On January 1, 1988, each domestic corporation existing on January 1, 1988, that is or becomes subject to chapters 51-68 of this title, shall be designated as a public benefit or a mutual benefit corporation as follows:

Any corporation designated by statute as a public benefit corporation or a mutual benefit corporation is the type of corporation designated by statute;

Any corporation which does not come within subdivision (1) but which is recognized as exempt under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)), or any successor section, is a public benefit corporation;

Any corporation which does not come within subdivision (1) or (2), but which is organized for a public or charitable purpose and which upon dissolution must distribute its assets to the United States, a state or a person which is recognized as exempt under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, or any successor section, is a public benefit corporation; and

Any corporation which does not come within subdivision (1), (2) or (3) is a mutual benefit corporation.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 18.06.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-1401.

48-68-105. Administrative procedures.

The secretary of state is authorized to prescribe forms and to promulgate regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 19.